Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0037.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 3406cc. (1) An insurer that delivers, issues for delivery, or renews in this state a health insurance policy that provides coverage for perinatal and gynecological services shall provide coverage for gynecological or perinatal care services, whether provided at an in-network health facility or agency or the individual's home, by an in-network physician, certified nurse midwife, or midwife acting within the scope of the physician's, certified nurse midwife's, or midwife's license or specialty certification. (2) As used in this section: (a) "Certified nurse midwife" means an individual who is licensed as a registered professional nurse under part 172 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.17201 to 333.17242, who has been granted a specialty certification in the health profession specialty field of nurse midwifery by the Michigan board of nursing under section 17210 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.17210. (b) "Health facility or agency" means that term as defined in section 20106 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.20106. (c) "Midwife" means that term as defined in section 17101 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.17101. (d) "Physician" means either of the following: (i) A physician licensed to engage in the practice of medicine under part 170 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.17001 to 333.17097. (ii) A physician licensed to engage in the practice of osteopathic medicine and surgery under part 175 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.17501 to 333.17556.